Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Chapter 1

Department of Environment and Conservation

11-1-101. Organization of department — Authority of commissioner — Historical commission.

The department of environment and conservation shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of environment and conservation, who shall have the same official status as other commissioners.

The commissioner is authorized to establish divisions, bureaus or other organizational units necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon the commissioner and the department.

The commissioner is authorized to appoint such deputy and assistant commissioners as may be necessary to discharge the powers and duties of the department. In the event of absence or incapacity of the commissioner or in the event of a vacancy in the office of the commissioner, an appropriate person designated by the governor may be authorized in accordance with § 4-4-115, to exercise any and all of the powers of the commissioner until such time as the duly appointed commissioner can fulfill such commissioner's responsibilities.

The commissioner is authorized to delegate any of the powers, duties, responsibilities or authority vested in the commissioner by the laws of the state of Tennessee.

The commissioner may adopt, promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations necessary to carry out such commissioner's duties and responsibilities.

The commissioner is also authorized to adopt, promulgate and enforce rules and regulations establishing fees and charges for departmental services including, but not limited to, licenses, permits, or authorizations rendered pursuant to or required by any statute administered by the department.

The department shall have transferred and attached to it the Tennessee historical commission, for purposes of administration.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 70; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.63 (Williams, § 255.73); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; Acts 1975, ch. 143, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-101; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 9.

Cross-References. Commissioner, appointment and powers, §§ 4-3-112, 4-3-121, 4-3-122.

Conservation laws and regulations, enforcement by forestry division, § 11-4-409.

Deeds, execution by commissioner conveying interest of state in surplus park lands, § 11-3-109.

Director of division of forestry known as state forester, § 11-4-103.

Division of educational service, § 11-1-110.

Division of geology established, § 11-5-101.

Establishment of department, § 4-3-101.

Forbidding of fires in period of drought, § 8-1-108.

Forestry division administration, § 11-4-401.

Forestry lands, purchase by division of forestry, § 11-4-404.

Lands, acceptance of gifts of, for forestry purposes, § 11-4-403.

Park managers and rangers, employment, § 11-3-107.

Powers of department in general, § 4-3-504.

Publication of annual departmental reports, § 4-4-114.

Sale of surplus park lands, § 11-3-108.

State forests, acquisition authorized, § 11-4-804.

Water quality, oil, and gas control board, commissioner as member, § 69-3-104.

Water resources division, title 69, ch. 7.

Attorney General Opinions. State park entrance fees and parking fees — authority to establish by rulemaking, OAG 00-039, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 39 (3/13/00).

11-1-102. Records and equipment of various divisions kept by department.

All records, equipment and properties of the division of geology and the former Tennessee state park and forestry commission shall be kept in the department of environment and conservation.

All records, equipment and properties of the division of forestry shall be kept in the department of agriculture.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the following records as defined by § 10-7-503 of any division of the department of environment and conservation shall be confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public:

Concerning radioactive materials regulated by the United States nuclear regulatory commission or by a state under an agreement with the nuclear regulatory commission pursuant to § 274(b) of the Atomic Energy Act (42 U.S.C. § 2021(b)), that are not available to the public under federal law, regulation, or guidance, or nuclear regulatory commission regulatory issue summary; provided, that records made confidential pursuant to this subdivision (c)(1) may be redacted whenever possible and made open for inspection and copying;

Disclosing the specific location of threatened, endangered, or rare species that would not be available to the public under the federal law or regulation;

Relating to a guest's use of state parks, including a state park guest's:

Name;

Home or mobile telephone number;

Address, including the street address or post office box number, city, state, and zip code;

Social security number;

Email address;

Reservation, rescheduling, and cancellation information;

Transaction information, including but not limited to purchases of goods or services; provided, however, that this subdivision (c)(3)(A)(vii) does not apply to aggregated statistical information that does not contain personally identifying information;

Payment and refund information, including, but not limited to, bank account, credit card, and gift certificate or gift card information;

Driver license information;

Vehicle registrations, including, but not limited to, automobiles, boats, and off-highway vehicles; and

Emergency contact information;

Nothing in subdivision (c)(3)(A) limits:

Access to information made confidential pursuant to subdivision (c)(3)(A):

By law enforcement agencies, courts, or other governmental agencies performing official functions; or

When a guest expressly authorizes the release of such information; or

The creation and release of an internal investigation report to persons identified within the report, unless the report is subject to a legal privilege against disclosure; or

Containing information regarding the specific location of a site or artifact if the commissioner or the commissioner's designee determines that disclosure of such records would create a substantial risk of damage to or destruction of either the historical value of such site or artifact or private property. For purposes of this subdivision (c)(4), “site” and “artifact” have the same meaning as defined in § 11-6-102.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 70-a; 1949, ch. 283, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.64 (Williams, § 255.74); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-102; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 10; 2007, ch. 198, § 1; 2017, ch. 125, § 1; 2018, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

11-1-103. Cooperation with wildlife resources agency — Relationships between divisions.

The several divisions located within the department of environment and conservation shall cooperate with the state wildlife resources agency, and the employees of the divisions shall lend whatever assistance is necessary to carry out the game and fish laws. Likewise, the employees of the state wildlife resources agency shall cooperate with the other divisions in the department and lend assistance whenever it is deemed necessary by the commissioner of environment and conservation, it being the purpose to coordinate fully the activities of the state wildlife resources agency with other conservation activities in the department. In the event any controversy shall arise in the department between any of the various divisions therein as to their respective duties and functions, the commissioner shall have authority to make the final decision concerning the controversy, and to define the respective limits of authority of each division.

Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.69A (Williams, § 5120.37); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 4, 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-103.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

11-1-104. Political activities of officers and employees.

No member, employee or officer of the department of environment and conservation shall use such member's, employee's or officer's official authority or influence for the purpose of interfering with an election or affecting the results thereof, or for the purpose of coercing the political action of any person or body. Failure to comply with the express purpose of this section constitutes grounds for immediate dismissal.

Acts 1939, ch. 217, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.68 (Williams, § 255.75d); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-104; Acts 2013, ch. 93, § 1.

11-1-105. Acquisition of land by gift, purchase, or condemnation — Lands to be sought — Titles to state — Approval by attorney general and reporter — Recommendations to general assembly.

The department of environment and conservation has the full power to acquire by gift, devise or purchase, or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain, areas, properties, lands, or any estate or interest therein, of scenic beauty, material or recreational utility, historic interest, remarkable phenomena or any other unusual features which in the judgment of the department should be acquired, preserved, and maintained for the use, observation, education, health, and pleasure of the people of Tennessee; provided, that such authority of acquisition shall be within the limits of any appropriations which may be made by the general assembly for the purchase of such properties, and the department shall have no power to purchase or contract for the purchase of any property beyond the amount contained in such appropriation.

The department has the power to institute and prosecute on behalf of the state of Tennessee any proceedings in the exercise of the power of eminent domain for the acquisition of such properties for public use in accordance with the laws relating to the exercise of such right and power.

All contracts shall be made and all titles shall be taken in the name of the state of Tennessee. The title shall be examined and approved by the attorney general and reporter before any property shall be purchased or acquired by condemnation.

The department may make recommendations to the general assembly of any other areas or properties for acquisition for which no appropriation may be made.

The department shall make diligent effort to obtain by gift lands or other property for park purposes.

All areas or properties so acquired shall be taken and held by the state for park purposes and the control and management thereof shall be vested in the department.

Acts 1925, ch. 55, §§ 3, 4; Shan. Supp., §§ 3047a3, 3047a4; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5196, 5199; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 69; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-105; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Cross-References. Records kept in department of environment and conservation, § 11-1-102.

11-1-106. Personal property — Acquiring and holding.

The department is empowered to receive by bequest, gift, or otherwise, money or other personal property for park purposes, to be held and used under § 11-1-105.

Acts 1925, ch. 55, § 4-a, as added by Acts 1927, ch. 57, § 1; Code 1932, § 5197; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 69; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-106; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

11-1-107. Power to convey to federal government.

In the event any property at any time acquired lies in the designated area of the Great Smoky Mountain National Park, the department is empowered to convey same to the federal government as a part of the national park.

Any money so received shall be deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the department and disbursed upon the warrant or written order of the commissioner.

Acts 1925, ch. 55, § 4-a, as added by Acts 1927, ch. 57, § 1; Code 1932, § 5198; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 69, 70a; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-107.

11-1-108. System of development and administration of land — Rules and regulations — Accounting for revenues.

The department shall make a careful study of lands in the state suitable for park purposes and shall formulate and adopt a system for the proper development, preservation, and administration thereof.

The department has the power to make rules and regulations and to promulgate the same for the management and control of this property for park purposes not inconsistent with the powers and restrictions herein.

All revenue which may be derived from such property shall be accounted for by itemized annual statements, and shall go into the state treasury for state purposes; provided, that the commissioner, with the approval of the state building commission, may pledge the revenues derived from any park facility to pay for the lease or purchase of such park facility and the amounts which may be so pledged shall be applied as provided in such pledge.

Acts 1925, ch. 55, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3047a4; Code 1932, § 5199; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 69, 70a; Acts 1974, ch. 775, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-108; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Attorney General Opinions. State park entrance fees and parking fees — authority to establish by rulemaking, OAG 00-039, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 39 (3/13/00).

11-1-109. Violation of rules and regulations punishable as misdemeanor.

Any violation of rules and regulations for the care and management of such properties as may be made under the authority of § 11-1-108 is a Class C misdemeanor.

In addition to the criminal penalty in subsection (a), the general assembly finds that it is appropriate that there be civil sanctions as well. Any person who does any of the following acts or omissions is subject to a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for each day during which the act or omission continues or occurs:

Any damage or vandalism to any state park;

The intentional removal or destruction in state parks of any rare, threatened or endangered species of plants as provided in §§ 70-8-304(2) and 70-8-305, and in all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to those sections; or

Any other violation of this part or the rules promulgated under this part.

The commissioner, through the attorney general and reporter, may institute proceedings for assessment in the chancery court of Davidson County or in the chancery court of the county in which all or part of the violation occurred, in the name of the department. In any such action, the commissioner may also recover, in addition to the civil penalty assessed under subsections (b) and (d), for any damages to the state parks that were the result of the activity.

In assessing the civil penalty, the court may consider the following factors:

Whether the civil penalty imposed will be a substantial economic deterrent to the illegal activity;

Damages to the state park, including compensation for loss or destruction of any part of the area, resulting from the violation, as well as expenses involved in enforcing this section and the costs involved in rectifying any damage;

The cause of the violation; and

Any economic benefit gained by the violator.

Any civil penalties paid to the state pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state park fund created by § 11-3-302.

No provision of this section shall be construed to restrict the state from recovering civil damages to state property as provided by law.

Acts 1925, ch. 55, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 3047a5; Code 1932, § 5200; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-109; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2007, ch. 486, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

11-1-110. Division of educational service — Director.

There is hereby created in the department of environment and conservation a division to be known as the “division of educational service.”

The head of the division shall be a director appointed by the commissioner of environment and conservation.

It is the duty of the division to promote education in regard to all conservation matters and to assist the various departments, divisions, and agencies with educational programs concerning conservation as may be deemed appropriate.

The director shall perform such other duties and functions as may be directed by the commissioner.

Acts 1957, ch. 314, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A., § 11-110.

11-1-111. Use of central office appropriations for division of educational service.

The commissioner of environment and conservation is hereby authorized and empowered to use such part of the commissioner's appropriation for the commissioner's central office as the commissioner may deem appropriate in connection with the division of educational service.

Acts 1957, ch. 314, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A., § 11-111.

11-1-112. Park facilities — Powers and duties of commissioner.

In order to provide park facilities for the department and to enable the construction and financing thereof on lands owned by the state or by an industrial development corporation which has been created under title 7, chapter 53, but for no other purpose unless authorized by law, the commissioner, with the approval of the state building commission, in the name of the state of Tennessee, has the following powers and duties:

Without limitation by reason of any other law, the power to sell and convey title to an industrial development corporation any land and any existing buildings or facilities thereon owned by the department for such consideration upon such terms and conditions as in the judgment of the commissioner and the state building commission are in the best interest of the state;

Without limitation by reason of any other law, the power to lease to an industrial development corporation for a term or terms, not exceeding fifty (50) years each, any land and existing buildings or facilities thereon owned by the department upon such terms and conditions as in the judgment of the commissioner and the state building commission are in the best interest of the state;

The power to lease or purchase from an industrial development corporation and to make available for public use any park facility erected upon land conveyed or leased to an industrial development corporation or upon any of the land owned by an industrial development corporation upon such terms, conditions and rentals or deferred payment obligations as in the judgment of the commissioner and the state building commission are in the best interest of the state;

The power to pledge and assign all or any part of the revenues derived from the operation of such park facility as security for the payment of the rentals or deferred payment obligations due and to become due under any lease or purchase under subdivision (3), and to covenant in any such lease or purchase agreement with respect to future pledges or assignments of such revenues; and

The power to covenant and agree in any lease or purchase made under subdivision (3) to:

Impose fees, rentals or other charges for the use or occupancy or other operation of such park facility in an amount calculated to produce revenues sufficient to pay the rentals or obligations due and to become due under such lease or purchase; and

Properly account for, secure, and disburse such fees, rentals and charges.

Acts 1974, ch. 775, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A., § 11-112.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1988, ch. 1034, § 1 provided that the authority granted by § 11-3-111 and this section, relative to lease and licensing arrangements in state parks, shall apply to any arrangement approved by the commissioner of environment and conservation to allow private contractors to construct and develop a golf course at Chickasaw State Park, and the commissioner is empowered to enter into a contract for such construction and development, subject to approval of the state building commission.

11-1-113. Grants for utility systems — “Utility system” defined.

Subject to the approval of the state building commission, the commissioner of environment and conservation is hereby authorized to make grants, as funds are available, to any municipality, county, town or city, utility district, public utility, or any authority, corporation, association or other organization which provides utility services, in order to assist in providing utility service to any state park, forest, or any unit of the Tennessee outdoor recreation area system authorized by § 11-3-103. Such grant shall be for construction purposes only, and shall be directly proportional to the benefits accruing to the state facility by the utility system.

“Utility system” includes water, sewerage, electric and solid waste.

Acts 1974, ch. 445, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-113; Acts 1986, ch. 912, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

11-1-114. Use of privately owned land for recreational purposes — Acquisition of adjacent lands.

The commissioner of environment and conservation has the authority to enter into agreements with any not-for-profit corporation chartered under the laws of this state, such agreements being for the purpose of planning, providing, maintaining, and/or administering recreational and natural areas and facilities for the use by the general public.

Such authority includes the power to provide duly commissioned park rangers for the enforcement of state laws and regulations on publicly and privately owned lands or waters used as recreational areas by the general public.

Furthermore, the commissioner has the authority to acquire by gift, purchase, exchange, assumption of tax payments, or other method specifically excluding condemnation, lands or easements adjacent to or near such recreational or natural areas for the purpose of facilitating the public use of these areas.

In exercising the authority granted in this section, the commissioner shall abide by all law relating to contracts, property management, and leasing, including such regulations as may be promulgated by appropriate state officials, subject to specific appropriation of funds by the general assembly.

Acts 1977, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-114.

11-1-115. Cloverbottom Mansion.

The commissioner of environment and conservation is authorized to contract with the Cloverbottom Association, subject to the approval of the state building commission, for its assistance in the renovation, repair, maintenance, operation and preservation of the Cloverbottom Mansion located in Davidson County.

This section shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to this section unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act and approved by the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1988, ch. 849, §§ 1, 2.

11-1-116. Policy of employing young persons to work in state parks and recreation areas.

It is the policy of the general assembly that young persons should assist in the preservation of state parks and recreation areas. The commissioner of environment and conservation is encouraged to employ persons under nineteen (19) years of age to work in state parks and recreation areas. These persons should be employed in nonhazardous duties that enhance the viability and purpose of Tennessee's pristine parks. The commissioner shall provide an annual report to the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and to the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives on the number of persons under nineteen (19) years of age who are employed to work in state parks and recreation areas, and in which state parks and recreation areas such persons are employed.

Acts 2006, ch. 561, § 1; 2012, ch. 604, § 9; 2013, ch. 236, § 7.

Cross-References. Child labor, title 50, ch. 5.

11-1-117. Initiation of proceedings — Injunctive relief.

The commissioner may initiate proceedings in the chancery court of Davidson County or the county in which the activities occurred against any person who is alleged to have violated or is about to violate this part or the rules promulgated under this part. In the action, the commissioner may seek, and the court may grant, injunctive relief and any other relief available in law or equity.

Acts 2007, ch. 486, § 2.